Massachusetts, session 194th, H1622.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 151B of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out, in line
182, the words “300 days” and inserting in place thereof the following words: “3 years”.
of 1